Utah statutes.
72-6-116.   Regulation of utilities -- Relocation of utilities.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Cost of relocation" includes the entire amount paid by the utility
company properly attributable to the relocation of the utility after deducting
any increase in the value of the new utility and any salvage value derived
from the old utility.
(b)  "Utility" includes telecommunication, gas, electricity, cable television,
water, sewer, data, and video transmission lines, drainage and irrigation
systems, and other similar utilities located in, on, along, across, over,
through, or under any state highway.
(c)  "Utility company" means a privately, cooperatively, or publicly owned
utility, including utilities owned by political subdivisions.
(2) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules for the installation,
construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, system upgrade, and relocation of
all utilities.
(b)  If the department determines under the rules established in this section
that it is necessary that any utilities should be relocated, the utility
company owning or operating the utilities shall relocate the utilities in
accordance with this section and the order of the department.
(3) (a)  The department shall pay 100% of the cost of relocation of a utility
on a state highway if the:
(i)  utility is owned or operated by a political subdivision of the state; or
(ii)  utility company owns the easement or fee title to the right-of-way in
which the utility is located.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(a) or (c), the department shall pay
50% of the cost of relocation of a utility on a state highway and the utility
company shall pay the remainder of the cost of relocation.
(c)  This Subsection (3) does not affect the provisions of Subsection
72-7-108(5).
(4)  If a utility is relocated, the utility company owning or operating the
utility, its successors or assigns, may maintain and operate the utility, with
the necessary appurtenances, in the new location.
(5)  In accordance with this section, the cost of relocating a utility in
connection with any project on a highway is a cost of highway construction.
(6) (a)  The department shall notify affected utility companies, in accordance
with Section 54-3-29, whenever the relocation of utilities is likely to be
necessary because of a reconstruction project.
(b)  The notification shall be made during the preliminary design of the
project or as soon as practical in order to minimize the number, costs, and
delays of utility relocations.
(c)  A utility company notified under this Subsection (6) shall coordinate
with the department and the department's contractor on the utility
relocations, including the scheduling of the utility relocations.
